New Jersey, session 222, S602.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a. As used in this section, licensee means the holder of a plenary retail consumption license or a seasonal retail consumption license pursuant to the provisions of R.S.33:1-12. b.    Every licensee shall offer for sale to customers beverage lids at a cost not to exceed a reasonable amount based on the wholesale cost of the beverage lids. c.     Every licensee shall post the following notice in a prominent and conspicuous location: Dont get roofied!  Drink lids available here.  Ask a staff member for details. d.    The provisions of this section shall not prevent a licensee from offering beverage lids to customers free of charge. e.     The Division of Alcoholic Beverage Control in the Department of Law and Public Safety shall post on its Internet website information about the requirements of this section, including, but not limited to, the signage that is required to be posted and the beverage lids that are required to be available. f.     The provisions of R.S.33:1-51 shall not apply to a violation of this section. 2.    This act shall take effect on the first day of the sixth month following enactment and shall expire on the first day of the thirtieth month after enactment.